Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1704.   Discontinued appeal with prejudice, except as authorized.

After notice of an appeal to the board is filed under Section 63G-6a-1702, no party may discontinue the appeal without prejudice, except as authorized by the procurement appeals panel appointed for the appeal.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

